Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201286-805
Wireless carrier; provide contact
information; Nebraska State Patrol; duties.

(1) Any wireless carrier authorized to do business in this
state or submitting to the jurisdiction of this state shall provide updated
contact information to the Nebraska State Patrol on a semiannual basis or
within three working days after a change in such information that would render
previous contact information invalid or inefficient for use under the Kelsey
Smith Act.

(2) The Nebraska State
Patrol shall collect and maintain a register of contact information for all
such wireless carriers.

Laws 2010, LB735, § 5.